Vermont, session 2025-2026, S316.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 4A is added to read:
Subchapter 4A. Credit Card Fees on Taxes and Gratuities
§ 2480s. PROHIBITON ON FEES
(a) Definitions. As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Electronic payment transaction” or “transaction” means a
transaction in which a person uses a debit card, credit card, or other payment
code or device issued or approved through a payment card network to debit a
deposit account or use a line of credit, whether authorization is based on a
signature, a personal identification number, or other means.
VT LEG #386001 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.316
2026 Page 2 of 4
(2) “Gratuity” means:
(A) a voluntary monetary contribution received by a merchant from a
guest, patron, or customer for services rendered; and
(B) an automatic service fee received by a merchant from a guest,
patron, or customer for services rendered that is intended to replace the need
for a voluntary monetary contribution pursuant to subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (2).
(3) “Interchange fee” means a fee established, charged, or received by a
payment card network for the purpose of compensating the issuer for its
involvement in an electronic payment transaction.
(4) “Issuer” means a person that issues a debit card or a credit card.
(5) “Merchant” means a person that collects and remits a tax.
(6) “Payment card network” means an entity that:
(A) directly or through licensed members, processors, or agents,
provides the proprietary services, infrastructure, and software that route
information and data to facilitate transaction authorization, clearance, and
settlement; and
(B) merchants are required to access in order to accept a specific
brand of general-purpose credit cards, charge cards, debit cards, or stored-
value cards as payment for goods and services.
VT LEG #386001 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.316
2026 Page 3 of 4
(7) “Processor” means an entity that facilitates, services, processes, or
manages a debit card or credit card authorization, billing, transfer, payment
procedures, or settlement with respect to an electronic payment transaction.
(8) “Tax” means any State or local sales, use, or excise tax imposed by
law and collected by the merchant at the point of sale.
(b) Prohibited fees. A payment card network shall not directly or indirectly
through an agent, issuer, acquirer bank, processor, fee schedule, contract,
requirement, condition, penalty, technological specification, or inducement:
(1) establish, charge, or publish any interchange fee that is calculated as
a percentage of a transaction amount if that amount includes any portion
attributable to tax or gratuity; or
(2) apply any surcharge or increase to the portion of a transaction not
attributable to tax or gratuity in an effort to offset the exclusion of such tax or
gratuity.
(c) Enforcement and penalties.
(1) A payment card network shall be liable for a civil penalty of
$1,000.00 per transaction that violates this subchapter.
(2) A merchant whose rights under this subchapter have been violated
may maintain a civil action for damages or equitable relief, including
attorney’s fees, if any.
VT LEG #386001 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.316
2026 Page 4 of 4
(3) A violation of this section shall be deemed a violation of section
2453 of this title. The Attorney General shall have the same authority to
conduct civil investigations, enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring
civil actions as provided under subchapter 1 of this chapter.
(d) Severability. If any provision of this subchapter or its application to
any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or applications of this subchapter that can be given effect without
the invalid provision or application, and, to this end, the provisions of this
subchapter are severable.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386001 v.1